Hawaii statutes.
§604-16 [Expenses of serving warrant.]
The expenses of serving such warrant shall be adjusted by the court originally
issuing the warrant. [L 1868, p 21; am imp L 1911, c 42; RL 1925, §2283; RL
1935, §3773; RL 1945, §9683; RL 1955, §216-14; HRS §604-16]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next